Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-302
Purpose of act.

The purpose of the Telecommunications Relay System Act is to provide a statewide telecommunications relay system and a statewide voucher program for the provision of specialized telecommunications equipment for qualified deaf, hard of hearing, or speech-impaired persons in Nebraska which enables them to communicate twenty-four hours per day, seven days per week, with other persons who use conventional telephone systems.

Laws 1990, LB 240, § 1;

R.S.Supp.,1992, § 86-901;

Laws 1993, LB 305, § 24;

Laws 1995, LB 146, § 1;

Laws 1997, LB 568, § 1;

Laws 1999, LB 359, § 4;

R.S.1943, (1999), § 86-1302;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 180.